Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-504
Tax; when levied.

If the time such election is held and such tax voted is before the tax lists for that year have been delivered to the county treasurer, then such levy shall be entered upon such tax lists for that year; but if such election is not held until after the tax lists for that year have been delivered to the county treasurer, then such tax shall not be levied or carried on such tax lists until the next annual levy of taxes, when the same shall be levied and collected annually for the time voted at such election.

Laws 1895, c. 27, § 4, p. 130;

R.S.1913, § 439;

C.S.1922, § 356;

C.S.1929, § 11-704;

R.S.1943, § 23-504.